Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 12.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201083-967
Director of Correctional Services;
administration of substances; execution team; confidentiality.

(1)
The Director of Correctional Services may designate any person qualified under
the terms of the execution protocol to administer to the convicted person
the substances necessary to comply with the execution protocol.

(2)
The identity of all members of the execution team, and any information reasonably
calculated to lead to the identity of such members, shall be confidential
and exempt from disclosure pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09 and shall
not be subject to discovery or introduction as evidence in any civil proceeding
unless extraordinary good cause is shown and a protective order is issued
by a district court limiting dissemination of such information.

Laws 2009, LB36, § 12.